Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 9
DIRECTORS - ORGANIZATION OF BOARD

32-1-901. Oath or affirmation and bond of directors.

Each director, within thirty days after his or her election or appointment to fill a vacancy, except for good cause shown, shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101, except as otherwise required by this section. When an election is canceled in whole or in part pursuant to section 1-13.5-513, each director who was declared elected shall take the oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101, except as otherwise required by this section, within thirty days after the date of the regular election, except for good cause shown. The oath shall be filed with the clerk of the court and with the division.

At the time of filing said oath, each director shall file a bond at the expense of the special district, in an amount determined by the board of not less than one thousand dollars each, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties as director.

If any director fails to take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101, except as otherwise required by this section, or furnish the requisite bond within the period allowed, except for good cause shown, his or her office shall be deemed vacant, and the vacancy thus created shall be filled in the same manner as other vacancies in the office of director.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1586, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1004, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 788, § 91, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 699, § 31, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-846 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

32-1-902. Organization of board - compensation - disclosure.

After taking oath and filing bonds, the board shall elect one of its members as chairman of the board and president of the special district, one of its members as a treasurer of the board and special district, and a secretary who may be a member of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one person, but, if such is the case, he or she shall be a member of the board. The board shall adopt a seal, and the secretary shall keep in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by employees, and all corporate acts, which shall be open to inspection of all electors, as well as to all other interested parties.

The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the special district in permanent records. He shall file with the clerk of the court, at the expense of the special district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount determined by the board of not less than five thousand dollars, conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of his office.

For directors serving a term of office commencing prior to January 1, 2018, each director may receive as compensation for the director's service a sum not in excess of one thousand six hundred dollars per annum, payable not to exceed one hundred dollars per meeting attended.
(3) (a) (I) For directors serving a term of office commencing prior to January 1, 2018, each director may receive as compensation for the director's service a sum not in excess of one thousand six hundred dollars per annum, payable not to exceed one hundred dollars per meeting attended.

For directors serving a term of office commencing on or after January 1, 2018, each director may receive as compensation for the director's service a sum not in excess of two thousand four hundred dollars per annum, payable not to exceed one hundred dollars per meeting attended.

No director shall receive compensation as an employee of the special district, other than that provided in this section, and any director shall disqualify himself or herself from voting on any issue in which the director has a conflict of interest unless the director has disclosed such conflict of interest in compliance with section 18-8-308, C.R.S. Reimbursement of actual expenses for directors shall not be considered compensation. No director receiving workers' compensation benefits awarded in the line of duty as a volunteer firefighter or pension payments to retired firefighters shall be allowed to vote on issues involving the director's disability or pension payments.

If a director of any special district owns undeveloped land which constitutes at least twenty percent of the territory included in the special district, such director shall disclose such fact in accordance with section 18-8-308, C.R.S., before each meeting of the board, and the fact of such disclosure shall be entered in the minutes of such meeting. For the purposes of this subsection (4), "undeveloped land" means real property which has not been subdivided or which has no improvements constructed on it, excluding real property dedicated for park, recreation, or open space purposes.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1586, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(3) amended, p. 845, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 572, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) added, p. 788, § 16, effective June 4.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 548, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 2005:

(3)(a) amended, p. 386, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 562, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 17-1297), ch. 364, p. 1905, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-902.5. Increasing the number of board members.

A special district having a five-member board may increase the number of board members to seven by the adoption of a resolution by the board and the approval of the resolution as specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The board shall consider the resolution at a public meeting after publication of notice regarding the place, time, and date of the meeting and of the proposed increase in the number of board members. Public input must be allowed at the meeting.

Upon adopting a resolution pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the board of county commissioners or governing body of the municipality that approved the service plan of the special district pursuant to section 32-1-204.5, 32-1-204.7, or 32-1-205. If, no later than forty-five days after the filing of the certified copy of the resolution, neither the board of county commissioners nor the governing body of the municipality has notified the board that it considers the plan to increase the number of board members to seven to be a material modification of the district's approved service plan, the board shall file the resolution with the clerk of the court, and the court shall enter an ex parte order establishing the number of the board members. The board shall record a certified copy of the order in the office of the county clerk and recorder in each county where the special district is organized and shall file a recorded certified copy of the order with the division.

If a special district increases the number of board members to seven as allowed in subsection (1) of this section, the additional directors shall serve as follows:

One person is elected at the next regular special district election following the date of official recording of the certified copy of the order described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, or a special election called for the purpose of electing additional directors, to serve an original term expiring at the next regular special district election thereafter; and

One person is elected at the next regular special district election following the date of official recording of the certified copy of the order described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, or a special election called for the purpose of electing additional directors, to serve an original term expiring at the second regular special district election thereafter.

After the original terms set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the additional directors shall serve four-year terms.

If a special district increases to a seven-member board as allowed in this section, the special district is not allowed to reduce to a five-member board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1198), ch. 119, p. 419, § 1, effective August 9.

32-1-902.7. Director districts.

The board may adopt a resolution to divide the district into director districts. A district with a five-member board may be divided into five director districts and a district with a seven-member board may be divided into seven director districts. Each director district must have, as nearly as possible, the same number of eligible electors and shall be as contiguous and compact as possible. In making the division, the board shall consider existing or potential developments within the proposed director districts that, when completed, would, in the reasonably near future, increase or decrease the number of eligible electors within the director district. The board shall then select from its members a representative of each director district, and if possible, the representative shall be an eligible elector from within a boundary of the director district they are selected to represent. Thereafter, directors must be eligible electors of the director district that they represent. If, after a reasonable time, the board determines that it is in the best interest of the district to revert to a single district format, the board may eliminate the director districts and thereafter operate as a single district by adopting a resolution.

If a board divides a district into director districts pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board shall also designate whether the directors representing the director districts must be elected at large, or by the eligible electors within each director district. If, after a reasonable time, the board determines that it is in the best interest of the district, the board may reverse this designation by adopting a resolution.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 542, § 14, effective September 7.

32-1-903. Meetings - definitions.

The board shall meet regularly at a time and in a location to be designated by the board. Special meetings may be held as often as the needs of the special district require, upon notice to each director. Special meetings include study sessions at which a quorum of the board is in attendance and notice of the meetings has been given in accordance with subsection (2) of this section or section 24-6-402 (2)(c), and at which information is presented but no official action can be taken by the board.

(1.5) All meetings of the board that are held solely at physical locations must be held at physical locations that are within the boundaries of the district or that are within the boundaries of any county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the physical location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (1.5) governing the physical location of meetings may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of the physical location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which meetings of the board are to be held in a physical location other than under the provisions of this subsection (1.5) and further stating the date, time, and physical location of such meeting.

Notice of time and location designated for all meetings is provided in accordance with section 24-6-402. Special meetings may be called by any director by informing the other directors of the date, time, and location of such special meeting, and the purpose for which it is called, and by providing notice in accordance with section 24-6-402. All official business of the board must be conducted only during meetings at which a quorum is in attendance at any location, and all said meetings shall be open to the public.

The meeting notice of all meetings of the board that are held telephonically, electronically, or by other means not including physical presence must include the method or procedure, including the conference number or link, by which members of the public can attend the meeting.

The notice posted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for any regular or special meeting at which the board intends to make a final determination to issue or refund general obligation indebtedness, to consolidate the special district with another special district, to dissolve the special district, to file a plan for the adjustment of debt under federal bankruptcy law, or to enter into a private contract with a director, or not to make a scheduled bond payment, shall set forth such proposed action.

The method of conducting any meeting held prior to July 7, 2021, by telephonic, electronic, or other virtual means is validated, ratified, confirmed, and may not be challenged.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Location" means the physical, telephonic, electronic, other virtual place, or combination of such means where a meeting can be attended.

"Meeting" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-6-402 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1587, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1496, § 4, effective April 10.

L. 91:

(3) added, p. 789, § 17, effective June 4.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1735, § 6, effective September 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (HB 17-1297), ch. 364, p. 1905, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1087), ch. 134, p. 610, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1278), ch. 471, p. 3381, § 1, effective July 7.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-904. Office.

The office of the special district shall be at some fixed place to be determined by the board.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1587, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-4-207 (1) as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-905. Vacancies.

A director's office shall be deemed to be vacant upon the occurrence of any one of the following events prior to the expiration of the term of office:

If for any reason a properly qualified person is not elected to a director's office by the electors as required at a regular election;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed fails, neglects, or refuses to subscribe to an oath of office or to furnish the bond in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-901;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed submits a written resignation to the board;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed ceases to be qualified for the office to which he was elected;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed is convicted of a felony;

If a court of competent jurisdiction voids the election or appointment or removes the person duly elected or appointed for any cause whatsoever, but only after his right to appeal has been waived or otherwise exhausted;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed fails to attend three consecutive regular meetings of the board without the board having entered upon its minutes an approval for an additional absence or absences; except that such additional absence or absences shall be excused for temporary mental or physical disability or illness;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed dies during his term of office.

Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment by the remaining director or directors, the appointee to serve until the next regular election, at which time, the vacancy shall be filled by election for any remaining unexpired portion of the term. If, within sixty days of the occurrence of any vacancy, the board fails, neglects, or refuses to appoint a director from the pool of any duly qualified, willing candidates, the board of county commissioners of the county which approved the organizational petition may appoint a director to fill such vacancy. The remaining director or directors shall not lose their authority to make an appointment to fill any vacancy unless and until the board of county commissioners which approved the organizational petition has actually made an appointment to fill that vacancy.

No board of county commissioners shall make an appointment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) unless it provides thirty days' notice of its intention to make such appointment to the remaining members of the board and the vacancy remains open at the time the board of county commissioners makes its appointment. If the organizational petition was approved by more than one board of county commissioners, then the appointment shall be made by the boards of the county commissioners which approved the petition, sitting jointly. Such an appointment shall be made at an open public meeting.

(2.5) If there are no duly elected directors and if the failure to appoint a new board will result in the interruption of services that are being provided by the district, then the board of county commissioners of the county or counties which approved the organizational petition may appoint all directors from the pool of duly qualified, willing candidates. The board appointed pursuant to this subsection (2.5) shall call for nominations for a special election within six months after their appointment, which special election is to be held in accordance with section 32-1-305.5 and article 13.5 of title 1; except that the question of the organization shall not be presented at the election. In the event a district is wholly within the boundaries of a municipality, the governing body of the municipality may appoint directors.

All appointments shall be evidenced by an appropriate entry in the minutes of the meeting, and the board shall cause a notice of appointment to be delivered to the person so appointed. A duplicate of each notice of appointment, together with the mailing address of the person so appointed, shall be forwarded to the division.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1587, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2.5) added, p. 1237, § 2, effective May 16.

L. 92:

(2) and (2.5) amended, p. 970, § 12, effective June 1; (2.5) amended, p. 885, § 123, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2015:

(2.5) amended, (HB 15-1092), ch. 87, p. 252, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2.5) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 788, § 92, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(2.5) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 542, § 15, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-849 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-906. Directors subject to recall - applicability of laws.

Any director elected or appointed to the board of any special district who has actually held office for at least six months may be recalled from office by the eligible electors of the special district; except that a petition shall not be filed to recall a director whose office is up for election in less than six months from the date the petition is presented for filing. Except as provided in section 32-1-913, a petition signed by the lesser of three hundred eligible electors or forty percent of the eligible electors demanding the recall of any director named in the petition must be filed in accordance with section 32-1-910 to initiate a recall election.

to (5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 886, § 124, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1588, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(5) added, p. 296, § 11, effective May 29.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 886, § 124, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 623, § 15, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(b.5) added, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1270, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1297, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1672, § 80, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-847 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-907. Recall election - resignation.

If a director subject to a recall petition offers a resignation, it shall be accepted, and the vacancy caused by the resignation, or from any other cause, shall be filled as provided by section 32-1-905 (2).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 887, § 125, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1589, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 887, § 125, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 623, § 16, effective May 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1298, § 2, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-848 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-908. Recall procedures.

Procedures to recall a director of a special district are governed by this part 9.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1298, § 3, effective May 4.

32-1-909. Recall petition - designated election official - approval as to form - definition.

A recall petition shall not be circulated until it has been approved as meeting the requirements of this section as to form.

A request to appoint a designated election official for a recall of a special district director must be filed with the court as defined in section 32-1-103 (2) for the special district. Within five business days of receipt of a request to appoint a designated election official of a recall petition for a special district director, the court shall issue an order appointing a designated election official who shall perform the duties set forth for the recall. The designated election official shall not be the director sought to be recalled by the petition or the spouse or civil union partner of the director sought to be recalled by the petition. If the court appoints a county clerk and recorder as the designated election official, then, notwithstanding any contrary provision in this code, the recall must be conducted in accordance with article 12 of title 1; except that sections 32-1-906, 32-1-907, 32-1-909 (4) to (6), 32-1-910 (2)(c), 32-1-911 (3)(b), (3)(c), and (4), and 32-1-912 still apply regardless of who is appointed the designated election official.

The designated election official shall approve or disapprove a petition as to form by the close of the third business day following his or her appointment as the designated election official. On the day that the petition is approved or disapproved as to form, the designated election official shall mail or transmit electronically written notice of the approval or disapproval to the committee as defined in subsection (4)(a) of this section, the board of directors of the special district, and the director sought to be recalled. If the designated election official disapproves the petition as to form, the designated election official shall identify in the written notice the portion or portions of the petition that are not sufficient and the reasons they are not sufficient.

Each petition must:

Designate by name and address at least three, but not more than five, eligible electors of the special district, referred to in this part 9 as the "committee", who represent the signers thereof in all matters affecting the petition;

Include the name of only one director to be recalled; and

Contain a general statement, in not more than two hundred words, of the grounds on which the recall is sought, which statement is intended for the information of the electors of the special district. The statement must not include any profane or false statement. The electors of the special district are the sole and exclusive judges of the legality, reasonableness, and sufficiency of the grounds on which the recall is sought, and said grounds are not subject to a protest or to judicial review.

The signatures to a recall petition need not all be on one sheet of paper. At the top of each signature page of the petition must be printed, in bold-faced type, the following:

Directly following the warning required by subsection (5) of this section must be printed in bold-faced type the following:

Warning:

It is against the law:

For anyone to sign this petition with any name other than one's own or to knowingly sign one's own name more than once for the same measure or to sign such petition when not an eligible elector.
Do not sign this petition unless you are an eligible elector. To be an eligible elector, you must be registered to vote in Colorado and be either a resident of the (name of special district), or be the owner or spouse or civil union partner of an owner of taxable real or personal property in the (name of special district) as described in section 32-1-103 (5) of the Colorado Revised Statutes.
Do not sign this petition unless you have read or have had read to you the proposed measure in its entirety and understand its meaning.

Petition to recall (name of director sought to be recalled) from the office of director of the (name of special district).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1298, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1672, § 81, effective June 21.

32-1-910. Petition in sections - signing - affidavit - review - tampering with petition.

A recall petition may be circulated and signed in sections, but each section must contain a full and accurate copy of the title and text of the petition as described in section 32-1-909 (4), and each signature page of each section must include the language set forth in section 32-1-909 (5) and (6).

All signed recall petitions must be filed with the designated election official within sixty days from the date on which the designated election official approves the petition as to form pursuant to section 32-1-909 (3).

A recall petition shall be signed only by eligible electors of the special district using their own signatures, after which each such elector shall print or, if such elector is unable to do so, shall cause to be printed, such elector's legal name, the residence address of such elector, including the street and number, if any, and the date of signing of the petition.

To each petition or petition section must be attached a signed, notarized, and dated affidavit of the person who circulated the petition stating the affiant's address, that the affiant is eighteen years of age or older, that the affiant circulated the petition, that the affiant made no misrepresentation of the purpose of such petition to any signer of the petition, that each signature on the petition was affixed in the affiant's presence, that each signature on the petition is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be, that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the affiant each person signing said petition was at the time of signing an eligible elector of the special district, and that the affiant neither has paid nor shall pay and that the affiant believes that no other person has so paid or shall pay, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value to any signer for the purpose of inducing or causing such signer to sign such petition.

Any disassembly of a petition or petition section that separates the affidavit from the signatures renders the signatures on such petition or petition section invalid and of no force and effect.

Promptly after the petition has been filed, the designated election official shall review all petition information and verify the information against the county clerk and recorder's registration records and the county assessor's records to determine whether it meets the requirements of section 32-1-906 (1) and subsections (2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(c) of this section.

The designated election official shall issue a written determination that a recall petition is sufficient or not sufficient by the close of the fifth business day after such petition is filed, unless a protest has been filed pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section prior to that date. On the day the designated official issues such written determination, he or she shall mail or transmit electronically a copy of the determination to the director sought to be recalled, the board of directors of the special district, and the committee as defined in section 32-1-909 (4)(a). The designated election official shall make a copy of the petition available to the director sought to be recalled.

The designated election official shall deem the petition sufficient if he or she determines that it was timely filed, has the required attached circulator affidavits, and was signed by the requisite number of eligible electors of the special district within sixty days following the date upon which the designated election official approved the form of the petition. The designated election official shall not remove the signature of an eligible elector from the petition after such petition is filed. If the designated election official determines that a petition or petition section is not sufficient, the designated election official shall identify those portions of the petition that are not sufficient and the reasons for such determination in the written determination required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

An eligible elector of the district may file a protest of a recall petition within fifteen days after such petition is filed. The protest must be in writing and signed under oath. The protest must be filed in the office of the designated election official and must set forth specifically the grounds of the protest. The grounds for a protest of a recall petition include, but are not limited to, the failure of any portion of a petition, petition section, circulator affidavit, or circulator to meet the requirements of this section or section 32-1-909.

Upon receiving a protest of a recall petition, the designated election official shall promptly mail a copy of the protest, together with a notice fixing a time for hearing the protest on a date not less than five nor more than ten business days after such notice is mailed, to the director sought to be recalled, the committee as defined in section 32-1-909 (4)(a), and the board of directors of the special district.

If the grounds of a protest include the failure of the petition to meet the signature requirements of section 32-1-906 (1) or subsection (2)(b) of this section, the designated election official shall provide the notice of the hearing to the county clerk and recorder and the county assessor of each county, any portion of the land area of which is located within the territorial boundaries of the special district. At least one business day before the hearing, the county clerk and recorder of each such county shall provide to the designated election official a registration list, as defined in section 1-13.5-103 (10), for the special district. At least one business day before the hearing, the county assessor of each such county shall provide to the designated election official a property owners list, as defined in section 1-13.5-103 (9), for the special district. The special district shall pay the costs of producing the registration lists and property owners lists. The designated election official shall use the lists prepared in accordance with this subsection (3)(d)(III) in determining whether the petition is sufficient.

The designated election official shall serve as the hearing officer. All testimony in the hearing must be given under oath. The hearing officer has the power to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses. The hearing must be summary and not subject to delay and must be concluded within forty days after the petition is filed. No later than five business days after the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall issue a written determination of whether the petition is sufficient or not sufficient. If the hearing officer determines that a petition is not sufficient, the hearing officer shall identify those portions of the petition that are not sufficient and the reasons for the insufficiency. The designated election official shall certify the result of the hearing to the committee as defined in section 32-1-909 (4)(a), the director sought to be recalled, and the board of directors of the special district.

If the designated election official determines that a petition is not sufficient, a majority of the committee as defined in section 32-1-909 (4)(a) may withdraw the petition and amend it and refile it; except that a petition withdrawn and refiled in accordance with this subsection (3)(e) shall not be withdrawn and refiled again. The committee may amend the petition by adding any required information relating to the signers or by attaching proper circulator affidavits. To be considered, the amended petition must be refiled with the designated election official in the same manner as the original petition within fifteen days after the designated election official issues the determination that the petition is insufficient. The designated election official shall issue a written determination that an amended and refiled petition is sufficient or not sufficient within five business days after the petition is refiled. An eligible elector may file a protest of an amended and refiled petition. A protest of an amended and refiled petition is subject to the provisions of subsection (3)(d) of this section; except that the protest must be filed within five business days of the date on which the amended petition was refiled.

A determination that a recall petition is sufficient or not sufficient is subject to review by the court as defined in section 32-1-103 (2) upon the written request of the director sought to be recalled, the director's representative, or a majority of the committee as defined in section 32-1-909 (4)(a); except that the statement of the grounds on which the recall is sought provided pursuant to section 32-1-909 (4)(c) is not subject to such review. A request for judicial review must be filed within five business days after the designated election official issues the determination.

When a recall petition is determined sufficient, the designated election official shall submit the petition, together with a certificate of its sufficiency, to the board of directors of the special district at a regular or special meeting of such board.
(4) (a) (I) When a recall petition is determined sufficient, the designated election official shall submit the petition, together with a certificate of its sufficiency, to the board of directors of the special district at a regular or special meeting of such board.

If no request for judicial review is filed, the board shall hold the regular or special meeting within thirty days following the expiration of the period within which a protest may be filed, or within thirty days of the date the written determination of sufficiency is issued, whichever is later. If a request for judicial review is filed, the board shall hold the regular or special meeting within thirty days following the issuance of a final order finding the petition sufficient.

At the meeting, the board shall order and fix a date for the recall election to be held not less than seventy-five days nor more than ninety days from the date of the meeting. The board shall determine whether voting in the recall election is to take place at the polling place or by mail ballot.

Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a)(III) of this section, if a regular special district election is to be held within one hundred eighty days after the date the board orders the recall election, the recall election must be held as part of such regular special district election; except that:

If the director sought to be recalled is seeking reelection at the regular special district election, only the question of such director's reelection appears on the ballot.

If a successor to the director sought to be recalled is to be selected at the regular special district election and the director sought to be recalled is not seeking reelection, only the question of the selection of the successor to the director appears on the ballot.

A recall election shall be conducted and the result of such election declared in accordance with article 13.5 of title 1, unless such recall election is conducted as part of a coordinated election as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

A recall election may be conducted as part of a coordinated election only if:

The content of the recall election ballot is finally determined by the date for certification of the ballot content for the coordinated election under section 1-5-203 (3); and

The county clerk and recorder agrees to conduct the recall election as part of the coordinated election.

A person commits a class 2 misdemeanor if such person willfully:

Destroys, defaces, mutilates, or suppresses a recall petition or petition section;

Fails to file or delays the delivery of a recall petition or petition section;

Conceals or removes a recall petition or petition section from the possession of a person authorized by law to have the custody thereof; or

Aides, counsels, procures, or assists another person in doing any of said acts.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1299, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

IP(7) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3257, § 544, effective March 1, 2022.